Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 6. Timber and Lumber.

Sec. 34.35.230.
Construction.

The purpose of AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

is remedial to secure laborers, contractors, and subcontractors the amount due them for labor performed in producing, or furnishing lumber.
AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

shall be liberally construed to effect this purpose.

History.

(§ 26-5-18 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.235.
Persons entitled to timber lien.

The following persons shall have liens upon timber for the work done upon, or in obtaining or securing, or for services rendered in towing, transporting, hauling, or driving it:

a person who performs labor upon, or who assists in obtaining or securing timber;

the owner of a tugboat or towboat that tows or assists in towing timber from one place to another within the state;

the owner of a team or a logging or traction engine that hauls or assists in hauling timber from one place to another within the state; and

the owner of a logging road over which timber is transported and delivered.

The lien attaches under (a) of this section whether the work or services are done, rendered, or performed at the instance of the owner of the timber or an agent of the owner.

The cook and other laborers in and about the logging or wood camp, the teamsters transporting the timber, and the laborers on roads and trails, not including public roads or trails, used for the transportation of the timber are considered persons who assist in obtaining, securing, and delivering the timber mentioned in this section.

History.

(§ 26-5-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.240.
Lien claim.

A person who claims a lien under AS

34.35.235

within 60 days after the completion of the service or after the close of the work must record a claim with the recorder of the recording district in which the timber is cut.

The claim must contain (1) a statement of the demand and the amount of the demand, after deducting as nearly as possible all just credits and offsets; (2) the name of the person by whom the claimant was employed; (3) a statement of the terms and conditions of the contract, or if there is no contract, the reasonable value of the service or work; and (4) a description of the property charged with the lien sufficient for identification with reasonable certainty. The claim shall be verified by the oath of the claimant or another who has knowledge of the facts.

The claim must be substantially in the following form:

CLAIM OF LIEN Claimant, v. Notice is given by this claim that , residing at , State of Alaska, claims a lien upon a of , being about in quantity, which were cut in recording district, State of Alaska, and are now lying or being at , for labor performed and assistance provided in said ; that the name of the owner or reputed owner is ; that employed said to perform the labor and provide the assistance upon the following terms and conditions, to wit: — That agreed to pay the for labor and assistance ; that the contract has been faithfully performed and fully complied with on the part of , who performed labor and assisted in for the period of ; that the labor and assistance were so performed and provided upon between the day of , and 45 days have not elapsed since that time; that the amount of the claimant’s demand for the service is ; that no part of the claim has been paid except ; and there is now due and remaining unpaid on the claim, after deducting all just credits and offsets, the sum of , and that claims a lien in this amount upon the and also claims a lien on all the now owned by in the recording district to secure payment for the work and labor in obtaining or securing the saw logs, spars, piles, cordwood, fuelwood, shingle bolts, or other timber herein in this claim. (Signature) State of Alaska Judicial District
ss. being first duly sworn on oath says that the undersigned is named in the foregoing claim of liens, has heard the claim read, knows the contents of the claim and believes the claim to be true. (Signature) Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of (Signature).

Click to view

History.

(§ 26-5-4 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.245.
Landowner’s lien for timber.

A person who permits another to go upon the person’s land and cut timber has a lien upon the timber for the price agreed to be paid for the privilege, or for the price the privilege would reasonably be worth if there is no express agreement fixing the price.

History.

(§ 26-5-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.250.
Landowner’s lien claim.

A person who claims a lien under AS

34.35.245

must record, within 90 days from the cutting of the timber, a claim with the recorder of the recording district in which the saw timber is cut.

The claim must be in substance the same as provided in AS

34.35.240

and must be verified as provided in that section.

History.

(§ 26-5-5 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.255.
Priority.

Liens under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

are preferred liens and are prior to other liens. A sale or transfer of timber does not divest a lien on it under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

.

As between liens under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

those for work and labor are preferred.

As between liens for work claimed by several laborers on the same timber, the claim or claims for work done or performed on the identical timber proceeded against, to the extent that the timber can be identified, are preferred as against the general claim of liens for work recognized and provided for in AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

.

The person performing the service or doing the work named in AS

34.35.235

is only entitled to the liens provided in AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

for services or work for six calendar months or a shorter period preceding the recording of the claim.

The person granting the privilege mentioned in AS

34.35.245

is only entitled to the lien under that section for timber cut during the six months preceding the recording of the claim as provided in AS

34.35.240

.

History.

(§ 26-5-3 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (d) and (e) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.260.
Duration of lien.

A lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

does not bind property for more than six months after notice of the lien is recorded, unless suit is brought to enforce the lien in the proper court within that time or if credit is given, within six months after the expiration of the credit.

A lien may not be continued in force for more than one year from the stopping of the work or by an agreement to give credit.

History.

(§ 26-5-7 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (a) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.265.
Enforcement of lien against manufactured product.

The lien provided for saw logs and shingle bolts is not released or lost by the manufacture of the saw logs or shingle bolts into lumber or shingles, and the lien may be enforced against the lumber and shingles manufactured from them.

A lien may not be acquired upon or enforced against lumber or logs after the lumber or logs are used in the construction of a building or structure, or upon spars, piles, or other timber mentioned in AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

after they are put to the use for which they are intended.

History.

(§ 26-5-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.270.
Commissioner of public safety as receiver.

The commissioner of public safety or a peace officer designated by the commissioner shall be the receiver, when one is appointed, and the superior court, upon a showing made, shall appoint the receiver, without notice.

The receiver is entitled to fees which seem just to the court, and shall account for the fees in the same manner as other fees collected in an official capacity.

When property subject to a lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

is in the custody of the receiver, a person who claims an interest in the property may deposit with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending a sum of money equal to the claim sued upon, together with $100 to cover costs and interest, unless the court makes an order fixing a different amount to cover the costs and interest, and may demand and receive the possession and custody of the property from the receiver immediately.

History.

(§ 26-5-9 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.275.
Bona fide purchasers.

The court shall conclusively presume that a party purchasing the property liened upon within the 60 days given to claimants to record their liens is not an innocent third party and is not a bona fide owner of the property, unless it appears that

the purchaser has paid full value for the property; and

the purchase money has been applied to the payment of the bona fide claims that are entitled to liens upon the property under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

according to the priorities established in those sections.

History.

(§ 26-5-10 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.280.
Enforceability.

The following persons may demand that a lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

be enforced:

a person who brings an action to enforce the lien; or

a person who has a lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

, and who is made a party to an action to enforce a lien under those sections.

The lien may be enforced against the whole, or a part of the lumber, when, during the six months preceding the recording of the lien,

the person has performed labor on it;

the person has assisted in securing or obtaining it; or

it has been cut on the person’s land.

The lien demand recorded must be for

all the labor upon or all the assistance in obtaining or securing the lumber during the whole or a part of the six months mentioned in AS

34.35.260

; or

timber cut during the whole or a part of the six months mentioned above.

The priority of the liens shall be determined under AS

34.35.255

where

proceedings are started against a lot of lumber;

some of the lienors claim liens against specific lumber to secure their claims for work and labor; and

other lienors claim liens against the lumber generally to secure their claims for work and labor.

History.

(§ 26-5-11 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (b) and (c) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.285.
Contractor’s lien.

A person who, as a contractor, supplies lumber under a contract is entitled to the lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

to the amount due on the contract.
However, the lien is subject and subsequent to the liens of the laborers under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

for the amounts due them for labor on the lumber.

History.

(§ 26-5-12 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.290.
Order of sale before judgment.

The court or judge may in vacation, upon motion supported by affidavit showing that the property is liable to loss or destruction, order that property subject to a lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

be sold by the peace officer before judgment is rendered, as personal property is sold under execution.

The proceeds of the sale shall be paid into court to be applied as provided in AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

.

History.

(§ 26-5-13 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.295.
Liability for injuring property or destroying identity.

A person who eloigns, injures, or destroys or who makes difficult, uncertain, or impossible the identification of timber upon which there is a lien under AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

, without the express consent of the lienholder, is liable to the lienholder for the damages to the amount secured by the lien, together with costs and charges of drawing and recording the lien and reasonable attorney fees for the foreclosure of the lien.

If these facts are shown to the court in the action to enforce the lien, the court shall enter a personal judgment for the amount of the damages in the action against the person, if the person is a party to the action, or the damages may be recovered in a civil action against the person.

History.

(§ 26-5-14 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.300.
Lien for manufacturing.

A person who performs work or assists in manufacturing timber into lumber has a lien upon the lumber while it remains at the mill where it is manufactured, or in the possession or under the control of the manufacturer, whether the work is done at the instance of the owner of the logs or an agent of the owner, or a contractor or subcontractor of the owner.

In this section “lumber” means logs or other timber sawed or split for use, including beams, joists, planks, bolts, shingles, rails, stays, hoops, and every article manufactured from timber.

History.

(§ 26-5-15 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.305.
Manufacturing lien claim.

A person who desires to claim the benefit of AS

34.35.300

shall, within 60 days after the close of the service mentioned in that section, record with the recorder of the recording district where the lumber is manufactured, a notice of claim of lien.

The notice must contain a statement of the demand and the amount of the demand in substance and form similar to that provided for in AS

34.35.240

.

The provisions of AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

relative to the liens of persons performing labor upon, or assisting, obtaining, and securing timber apply in all respects, where applicable, to the liens of persons who perform work in manufacturing lumber, as set out in AS

34.35.300

.

History.

(§ 26-5-16 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (a) and (b) of this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Sec. 34.35.310.
Release upon filing bond.

After a lien attaches to property mentioned in AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

, the owner of the property or a person on behalf of the owner may file with the clerk of the superior court in the judicial district in which the property is located a bond (1) in a sum double the amount claimed in the lien notice; (2) executed by two sureties who have the qualifications of bail upon arrest; (3) to be approved by the clerk of the court; (4) running to the claimant in the lien notice; and (5) conditioned for the payment of the damages, costs, charges, and disbursements recovered by the lien claimant against the owner, or found to be a lien upon the property described in the lien notice.

The clerk shall issue to the owner or other person a certificate stating that the bond is substituted in place of the property and that the lien on the property is released and discharged. A marginal entry of the release and substitution of bond shall be made in the lien docket in the office of the recorder where the lien statement is recorded.

If the lien claimant establishes the lien by a suit to enforce it, the claimant is entitled to judgment or decree against the principal and sureties on the bond.

Nothing in this section deprives a person of a defense that the person would have had if the bond had not been given. The filing of the bond does not affect the time within which the foreclosure suit shall be started.

History.

(§ 26-5-17 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 34.35.315.
Definitions.

In AS

34.35.230

—

34.35.315

,

“lumber” includes timber, or lumber or shingles manufactured from it;

“timber” includes saw logs, piles, spars, cordwood, fuelwood, shingle bolts, or other timber.

History.

(§ 26-5-18 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1985 to alphabetize the defined terms.